Illinois, session 104th, SB61.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Preferential Admission Ban Act. 6    Section 5. Intent. It is the intent of the General 7Assembly to stop the practice of legacy and donor admissions 8and protect students as they pursue their higher education. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Donor preference in admissions" means considering an 11applicant's relation to a donor of, or a donation to, an 12independent institution of higher education as a factor in the 13admissions process, including asking an applicant to indicate 14the applicant's family's donor status and including that 15information among the documents that the independent 16institution of higher education uses to consider an applicant 17for admission.18    "Independent institution of higher education" means a 19nonpublic higher education institution that grants 20undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, that is 21formed as a nonprofit corporation in this State, that is 22accredited by an agency recognized by the United States   SB0061- 2 -LRB104 04191 LNS 14215 b1Department of Education, and that receives, or benefits from, 2State-funded student financial assistance or that enrolls 3students who receive State-funded student financial 4assistance.5    "Legacy preference in admissions" means considering an 6applicant's relation to an alumnus of an independent 7institution of higher education as a factor in the admissions 8process, including asking an applicant to indicate where the 9applicant's relatives attended college and including that 10information among the documents that the independent 11institution of higher education uses to consider an applicant 12for admission. "Legacy preference in admissions" does not 13include collecting data on an applicant's relation to alumni 14or donors for purposes other than admissions decisions. 15    Section 15. Preferential admissions prohibited.16    (a) Beginning September 1, 2025, an independent 17institution of higher education shall not provide a legacy 18preference in admissions or a donor preference in admissions 19to an applicant as part of the regular or early action 20admissions process.21    (b) On or before June 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, 22an independent institution of higher education shall report to 23the General Assembly and the Office of the Attorney General 24either of the following:25        (1) That the independent institution of higher   SB0061- 3 -LRB104 04191 LNS 14215 b1    education was in compliance with subsection (a) for all 2    enrolled students for that academic year.3        (2) That the independent institution of higher 4    education was in violation of subsection (a) for that 5    academic year. An independent institution of higher 6    education that reports that it was in violation of 7    subsection (a), regardless of the number of violations, 8    shall include in its report both of the following for that 9    academic year:10            (A) The legacy status, donor status, race, county 11        of residence, income brackets, and athletic status of 12        newly enrolled students at the independent institution 13        of higher education.14            (B) The admissions rate of students who are 15        provided a legacy preference or donor preference in 16        admissions, as compared to the admissions rate of 17        students who are not provided a legacy preference or 18        donor preference in admissions.19    Data in the report shall be publicly provided only in the 20aggregate and in a manner that prevents the identification of 21any individual.22    (c) The Office of the Attorney General shall post the 23names of the independent institutions of higher education that 24violate subsection (a) on its Internet website by the next 25fiscal year after receiving reports under subsection (b).